lexd_components/hyw-nouns_lex_irreg.lexd
#Adverbs which take -van when nominalized
LEXICON NounTimeVanAdv
այսօր:այսօր
առաջ:առաջ
անգամ:անգամ
շատոնց:շատոնց
յառաջ:յառաջ

LEXICON IrregFrozenCase
դուստր<n><sg><dat_gen>:դստեր
կայսր<n><sg><dat_gen>:կայսեր
կին<n><pl><dat_gen>:կանանց
կին<n><pl>:կանայք
կորուստ<n><sg><dat_gen>:կորստեան
հանգիստ<n><sg><dat_gen>:հանգստեան
ծննունդ<n><sg><dat_gen>:ծննդեան
գալուստ<n><sg><dat_gen>:գալստեան
թաքուստ<n_adj><subst><sg><dat_gen>:թաքստեան
փախուստ<n><sg><dat_gen>:փախստեան
ժողովուրդ<n><sg><dat_gen>:ժողովրդեան
յառաջ<adv><subst><sg><abl>:յառաջուց
պզտիկ<adv><subst><sg><abl>:պզտիկուց
ափ<n><sg><abl>:ափանց
ասորի<n><pl><dat_gen>:ասորւոց
մարդ<n><pl><dat_gen>:մարդկան
յոյն<n><pl><dat_gen>:յունաց
գիր<n><sg><gen>:գրոյն
կերպարանք<n><ins>:կերպարանօք
հիւսիսականք<n><pl><dat_gen>:հիւսիսականաց
հրահանգ<n><pl><dat_gen>:հրահանգաց		
փոփոխումն<n><pl><dat_gen>:փոփոխմանց	
գործ<n><pl><dat_gen>:գործոց
այլ<n><pl><dat_gen>:այլոց
աղջիկ<n><pl><dat_gen>:աղջկանց
դպիր<n><pl><dat_gen>:դպրաց
մանուկ<n><pl><dat_gen>:մանկանց
սուրբ<adj><subst><pl><dat_gen>:սրբոց
Վան<np><top><sg><dat_gen>:Վանայ
Աղուանք<np><top><sg><dat_gen>:Աղուանից
պարս<n><pl><dat_gen>:պարսից
առաքեալ<n><pl><dat_gen>:առաքելոց
Հայաստան<np><top><sg><dat_gen>:Հայաստանեայց
մարդ<n><pl><dat_gen>:մարդկանց

LEXICON NounTimeVanHima
հիմա:հիմա #This word takes the time suffixes with կ

#These irregulars only take an optional irregular dative ան, and its inflected like -անէ 
#while everything else is regular
#My cheat is to only use the reduced stem here
#Each of these words should have a duplicate entry in the regular list, else in time list
LEXICON NounOldAnForm
գարուն:գարն
աշուն:աշն
ամառ:ամռ
ձմեռ:ձմռ
մանուկ:մանկ
կնիկ:կնկ

լեռ:լեռ
հրալեռ:հրալեռ{mono}
սառնալեռ:սառնալեռ{mono}
լեռ:լեր # Dir/LR
հրալեռ:հրալեր{mono} # Dir/LR
սառնալեռ:սառնալեր{mono} # Dir/LR

դուռ:դր
կողմ:կողմ
բեռ:բեռ

անուն:անու
հիմն:հիմ
արիւն:արե

էրիկ:էրկ

աղջիկ:աղջկ
հօրաքեռաղջիկ:հօրաքեռաղջկ
մօրաքեռաղջիկ:մօրաքեռաղջկ

ձուկ:ձկ
հրձուկ:հրձկ{mono}
աչաձուկ:աչաձկ{mono}
բրաձուկ:բրաձկ{mono}
թիաձուկ:թիաձկ{mono}
թռաձուկ:թռաձկ{mono}
թրաձուկ:թրաձկ{mono}
իժաձուկ:իժաձկ{mono}
իշաձուկ:իշաձկ{mono}
կզաձուկ:կզաձկ{mono}
կժաձուկ:կժաձկ{mono}
հրաձուկ:հրաձկ{mono}
ձիաձուկ:ձիաձկ{mono}
սրաձուկ:սրաձկ{mono}
տքաձուկ:տքաձկ{mono}
ցլաձուկ:ցլաձկ{mono}
փղաձուկ:փղաձկ{mono}
փշաձուկ:փշաձկ{mono}
փքաձուկ:փքաձկ{mono}
քնաձուկ:քնաձկ{mono}
այծեձուկ:այծեձկ{mono}
ասրաձուկ:ասրաձկ{mono}
բազէձուկ:բազէձկ{mono}
բահաձուկ:բահաձկ{mono}
բստաձուկ:բստաձկ{mono}
գլխաձուկ:գլխաձկ{mono}
գնդաձուկ:գնդաձկ{mono}
գողաձուկ:գողաձկ{mono}
գրգաձուկ:գրգաձկ{mono}
դեւաձուկ:դեւաձկ{mono}
թակաձուկ:թակաձկ{mono}
թոքաձուկ:թոքաձկ{mono}
լուսաձուկ:լուսաձկ{mono}
լսնաձուկ:լսնաձկ{mono}
լօռաձուկ:լօռաձկ{mono}
խաղաձուկ:խաղաձկ{mono}
խառաձուկ:խառաձկ{mono}
խարաձուկ:խարաձկ{mono}
խլնաձուկ:խլնաձկ{mono}
խոզաձուկ:խոզաձկ{mono}
խռկաձուկ:խռկաձկ{mono}
խռպաձուկ:խռպաձկ{mono}
խստաձուկ:խստաձկ{mono}
կնճաձուկ:կնճաձկ{mono}
կովաձուկ:կովաձկ{mono}
կտցաձուկ:կտցաձկ{mono}
ձողաձուկ:ձողաձկ{mono}
մածաձուկ:մածաձկ{mono}
մոմաձուկ:մոմաձկ{mono}
մրճաձուկ:մրճաձկ{mono}
մօրաձուկ:մօրաձկ{mono}
նետաձուկ:նետաձկ{mono}
նռնաձուկ:նռնաձկ{mono}
նրբաձուկ:նրբաձկ{mono}
շանաձուկ:շանաձկ{mono}
շնկաձուկ:շնկաձկ{mono}
ոզնեձուկ:ոզնեձկ{mono}
ոսկեձուկ:ոսկեձկ{mono}
որփաձուկ:որփաձկ{mono}
ուռնաձուկ:ուռնաձկ{mono}
պրկաձուկ:պրկաձկ{mono}
ռնգաձուկ:ռնգաձկ{mono}
սահաձուկ:սահաձկ{mono}
սելաձուկ:սելաձկ{mono}
սեկաձուկ:սեկաձկ{mono}
սեւաձուկ:սեւաձկ{mono}
սոխաձուկ:սոխաձկ{mono}
վիմաձուկ:վիմաձկ{mono}
տափաձուկ:տափաձկ{mono}
տիգաձուկ:տիգաձկ{mono}
փառաձուկ:փառաձկ{mono}
փողաձուկ:փողաձկ{mono}
քարաձուկ:քարաձկ{mono}
աստղաձուկ:աստղաձկ{mono}
արեւաձուկ:արեւաձկ{mono}
արկղաձուկ:արկղաձկ{mono}
աւարաձուկ:աւարաձկ{mono}
աքարաձուկ:աքարաձկ{mono}
գայլաձուկ:գայլաձկ{mono}
գառնաձուկ:գառնաձկ{mono}
գետնաձուկ:գետնաձկ{mono}
գլխանձուկ:գլխանձկ{mono}
գորտաձուկ:գորտաձկ{mono}
դրօշաձուկ:դրօշաձկ{mono}
երիզաձուկ:երիզաձկ{mono}
երփնաձուկ:երփնաձկ{mono}
զրահաձուկ:զրահաձկ{mono}
թիւմաձուկ:թիւմաձկ{mono}
թմբկաձուկ:թմբկաձկ{mono}
թմբրաձուկ:թմբրաձկ{mono}
ժայռաձուկ:ժայռաձկ{mono}
լեզուաձուկ:լեզուաձկ{mono}
լճակաձուկ:լճակաձկ{mono}
լուսնաձուկ:լուսնաձկ{mono}
խայթաձուկ:խայթաձկ{mono}
խայտաձուկ:խայտաձկ{mono}
խանչաձուկ:խանչաձկ{mono}
խանջաձուկ:խանջաձկ{mono}
խարդաձուկ:խարդաձկ{mono}
խորդաձուկ:խորդաձկ{mono}
խռնջաձուկ:խռնջաձկ{mono}
կաթնաձուկ:կաթնաձկ{mono}
կաստաձուկ:կաստաձկ{mono}
կատուաձուկ:կատուաձկ{mono}
կարթաձուկ:կարթաձկ{mono}
կելպաձուկ:կելպաձկ{mono}
կռնկաձուկ:կռնկաձկ{mono}
հասկաձուկ:հասկաձկ{mono}
հաստաձուկ:հաստաձկ{mono}
ձգանաձուկ:ձգանաձկ{mono}
մագլաձուկ:մագլաձկ{mono}
մանգաձուկ:մանգաձկ{mono}
մերկաձուկ:մերկաձկ{mono}
մօրուաձուկ:մօրուաձկ{mono}
նշդրաձուկ:նշդրաձկ{mono}
նշտրաձուկ:նշտրաձկ{mono}
շեղբաձուկ:շեղբաձկ{mono}
շերտաձուկ:շերտաձկ{mono}
ոսկրաձուկ:ոսկրաձկ{mono}
պարկաձուկ:պարկաձկ{mono}
ռազմաձուկ:ռազմաձկ{mono}
սակրաձուկ:սակրաձկ{mono}
սարդաձուկ:սարդաձկ{mono}
սափրաձուկ:սափրաձկ{mono}
սղոցաձուկ:սղոցաձկ{mono}
սպիտաձուկ:սպիտաձկ{mono}
սրնգաձուկ:սրնգաձկ{mono}
վարդաձուկ:վարդաձկ{mono}
տարմաձուկ:տարմաձկ{mono}
տիկնաձուկ:տիկնաձկ{mono}
ցայտաձուկ:ցայտաձկ{mono}
փայլաձուկ:փայլաձկ{mono}
փայտաձուկ:փայտաձկ{mono}
օղակաձուկ:օղակաձկ{mono}
ագռաւաձուկ:ագռաւաձկ{mono}
աղուեսաձուկ:աղուեսաձկ{mono}
աշնանաձուկ:աշնանաձկ{mono}
առիւծաձուկ:առիւծաձկ{mono}
ասպարաձուկ:ասպարաձկ{mono}
արծաթաձուկ:արծաթաձկ{mono}
արքայաձուկ:արքայաձկ{mono}
գոմիշաձուկ:գոմիշաձկ{mono}
դորակաձուկ:դորակաձկ{mono}
դրախտաձուկ:դրախտաձկ{mono}
եղջերաձուկ:եղջերաձկ{mono}
թութակաձուկ:թութակաձկ{mono}
իշխանաձուկ:իշխանաձկ{mono}
խարակաձուկ:խարակաձկ{mono}
ծիրանաձուկ:ծիրանաձկ{mono}
կանաչաձուկ:կանաչաձկ{mono}
կարանաձուկ:կարանաձկ{mono}
կարիճաձուկ:կարիճաձկ{mono}
կարմրաձուկ:կարմրաձկ{mono}
կիթառաձուկ:կիթառաձկ{mono}
կոհակաձուկ:կոհակաձկ{mono}
հայելաձուկ:հայելաձկ{mono}
հովանաձուկ:հովանաձկ{mono}
ճագարաձուկ:ճագարաձկ{mono}
մելանաձուկ:մելանաձկ{mono}
մողիզաձուկ:մողիզաձկ{mono}
մօրինաձուկ:մօրինաձկ{mono}
նիզակաձուկ:նիզակաձկ{mono}
պանանաձուկ:պանանաձկ{mono}
պիսակաձուկ:պիսակաձկ{mono}
սկիւռաձուկ:սկիւռաձկ{mono}
ստուերաձուկ:ստուերաձկ{mono}
վահանաձուկ:վահանաձկ{mono}
վարազաձուկ:վարազաձկ{mono}
վարնգաձուկ:վարնգաձկ{mono}
վիշապաձուկ:վիշապաձկ{mono}
գեղարդաձուկ:գեղարդաձկ{mono}
ելեկտրաձուկ:ելեկտրաձկ{mono}
լապտերաձուկ:լապտերաձկ{mono}
խարտոցաձուկ:խարտոցաձկ{mono}
ծիածանաձուկ:ծիածանաձկ{mono}
ծիծեռնաձուկ:ծիծեռնաձկ{mono}
կենդանաձուկ:կենդանաձկ{mono}
ճերմակաձուկ:ճերմակաձկ{mono}
յամպարաձուկ:յամպարաձկ{mono}
նաւուղղաձուկ:նաւուղղաձկ{mono}
պատեանաձուկ:պատեանաձկ{mono}
սկուտեղաձուկ:սկուտեղաձկ{mono}
սպիտակաձուկ:սպիտակաձկ{mono}
առագաստաձուկ:առագաստաձկ{mono}
կաղամարաձուկ:կաղամարաձկ{mono}
հրեշտակաձուկ:հրեշտակաձկ{mono}
մանիշակաձուկ:մանիշակաձկ{mono}
մանուշակաձուկ:մանուշակաձկ{mono}
մարգարտաձուկ:մարգարտաձկ{mono}


LEXICON NounReg #For the -an words which have regular alternates instead of other specialized classes
գարուն:գարուն
աշուն:աշուն
ամառ:ամառ
ձմեռ:ձմեռ
մանուկ:մանուկ
կնիկ:կնիկ

լեռ:լեռ
հրալեռ:հրալեռ{mono}
սառնալեռ:սառնալեռ{mono}

դուռ:դուռ
կողմ:կողմ
բեռ:բեռ

անուն:անուն
հիմն:հիմն
արիւն:արիւն

էրիկ:էրիկ

աղջիկ:աղջիկ
հօրաքեռաղջիկ:հօրաքեռաղջիկ
մօրաքեռաղջիկ:մօրաքեռաղջիկ

ձուկ:ձուկ
հրձուկ:հրձուկ{mono}
աչաձուկ:աչաձուկ{mono}
բրաձուկ:բրաձուկ{mono}
թիաձուկ:թիաձուկ{mono}
թռաձուկ:թռաձուկ{mono}
թրաձուկ:թրաձուկ{mono}
իժաձուկ:իժաձուկ{mono}
իշաձուկ:իշաձուկ{mono}
կզաձուկ:կզաձուկ{mono}
կժաձուկ:կժաձուկ{mono}
հրաձուկ:հրաձուկ{mono}
ձիաձուկ:ձիաձուկ{mono}
սրաձուկ:սրաձուկ{mono}
տքաձուկ:տքաձուկ{mono}
ցլաձուկ:ցլաձուկ{mono}
փղաձուկ:փղաձուկ{mono}
փշաձուկ:փշաձուկ{mono}
փքաձուկ:փքաձուկ{mono}
քնաձուկ:քնաձուկ{mono}
այծեձուկ:այծեձուկ{mono}
ասրաձուկ:ասրաձուկ{mono}
բազէձուկ:բազէձուկ{mono}
բահաձուկ:բահաձուկ{mono}
բստաձուկ:բստաձուկ{mono}
գլխաձուկ:գլխաձուկ{mono}
գնդաձուկ:գնդաձուկ{mono}
գողաձուկ:գողաձուկ{mono}
գրգաձուկ:գրգաձուկ{mono}
դեւաձուկ:դեւաձուկ{mono}
թակաձուկ:թակաձուկ{mono}
թոքաձուկ:թոքաձուկ{mono}
լուսաձուկ:լուսաձուկ{mono}
լսնաձուկ:լսնաձուկ{mono}
լօռաձուկ:լօռաձուկ{mono}
խաղաձուկ:խաղաձուկ{mono}
խառաձուկ:խառաձուկ{mono}
խարաձուկ:խարաձուկ{mono}
խլնաձուկ:խլնաձուկ{mono}
խոզաձուկ:խոզաձուկ{mono}
խռկաձուկ:խռկաձուկ{mono}
խռպաձուկ:խռպաձուկ{mono}
խստաձուկ:խստաձուկ{mono}
կնճաձուկ:կնճաձուկ{mono}
կովաձուկ:կովաձուկ{mono}
կտցաձուկ:կտցաձուկ{mono}
ձողաձուկ:ձողաձուկ{mono}
մածաձուկ:մածաձուկ{mono}
մոմաձուկ:մոմաձուկ{mono}
մրճաձուկ:մրճաձուկ{mono}
մօրաձուկ:մօրաձուկ{mono}
նետաձուկ:նետաձուկ{mono}
նռնաձուկ:նռնաձուկ{mono}
նրբաձուկ:նրբաձուկ{mono}
շանաձուկ:շանաձուկ{mono}
շնկաձուկ:շնկաձուկ{mono}
ոզնեձուկ:ոզնեձուկ{mono}
ոսկեձուկ:ոսկեձուկ{mono}
որփաձուկ:որփաձուկ{mono}
ուռնաձուկ:ուռնաձուկ{mono}
պրկաձուկ:պրկաձուկ{mono}
ռնգաձուկ:ռնգաձուկ{mono}
սահաձուկ:սահաձուկ{mono}
սելաձուկ:սելաձուկ{mono}
սեկաձուկ:սեկաձուկ{mono}
սեւաձուկ:սեւաձուկ{mono}
սոխաձուկ:սոխաձուկ{mono}
վիմաձուկ:վիմաձուկ{mono}
տափաձուկ:տափաձուկ{mono}
տիգաձուկ:տիգաձուկ{mono}
փառաձուկ:փառաձուկ{mono}
փողաձուկ:փողաձուկ{mono}
քարաձուկ:քարաձուկ{mono}
աստղաձուկ:աստղաձուկ{mono}
արեւաձուկ:արեւաձուկ{mono}
արկղաձուկ:արկղաձուկ{mono}
աւարաձուկ:աւարաձուկ{mono}
աքարաձուկ:աքարաձուկ{mono}
գայլաձուկ:գայլաձուկ{mono}
գառնաձուկ:գառնաձուկ{mono}
գետնաձուկ:գետնաձուկ{mono}
գլխանձուկ:գլխանձուկ{mono}
գորտաձուկ:գորտաձուկ{mono}
դրօշաձուկ:դրօշաձուկ{mono}
երիզաձուկ:երիզաձուկ{mono}
երփնաձուկ:երփնաձուկ{mono}
զրահաձուկ:զրահաձուկ{mono}
թիւմաձուկ:թիւմաձուկ{mono}
թմբկաձուկ:թմբկաձուկ{mono}
թմբրաձուկ:թմբրաձուկ{mono}
ժայռաձուկ:ժայռաձուկ{mono}
լեզուաձուկ:լեզուաձուկ{mono}
լճակաձուկ:լճակաձուկ{mono}
լուսնաձուկ:լուսնաձուկ{mono}
խայթաձուկ:խայթաձուկ{mono}
խայտաձուկ:խայտաձուկ{mono}
խանչաձուկ:խանչաձուկ{mono}
խանջաձուկ:խանջաձուկ{mono}
խարդաձուկ:խարդաձուկ{mono}
խորդաձուկ:խորդաձուկ{mono}
խռնջաձուկ:խռնջաձուկ{mono}
կաթնաձուկ:կաթնաձուկ{mono}
կաստաձուկ:կաստաձուկ{mono}
կատուաձուկ:կատուաձուկ{mono}
կարթաձուկ:կարթաձուկ{mono}
կելպաձուկ:կելպաձուկ{mono}
կռնկաձուկ:կռնկաձուկ{mono}
հասկաձուկ:հասկաձուկ{mono}
հաստաձուկ:հաստաձուկ{mono}
ձգանաձուկ:ձգանաձուկ{mono}
մագլաձուկ:մագլաձուկ{mono}
մանգաձուկ:մանգաձուկ{mono}
մերկաձուկ:մերկաձուկ{mono}
մօրուաձուկ:մօրուաձուկ{mono}
նշդրաձուկ:նշդրաձուկ{mono}
նշտրաձուկ:նշտրաձուկ{mono}
շեղբաձուկ:շեղբաձուկ{mono}
շերտաձուկ:շերտաձուկ{mono}
ոսկրաձուկ:ոսկրաձուկ{mono}
պարկաձուկ:պարկաձուկ{mono}
ռազմաձուկ:ռազմաձուկ{mono}
սակրաձուկ:սակրաձուկ{mono}
սարդաձուկ:սարդաձուկ{mono}
սափրաձուկ:սափրաձուկ{mono}
սղոցաձուկ:սղոցաձուկ{mono}
սպիտաձուկ:սպիտաձուկ{mono}
սրնգաձուկ:սրնգաձուկ{mono}
վարդաձուկ:վարդաձուկ{mono}
տարմաձուկ:տարմաձուկ{mono}
տիկնաձուկ:տիկնաձուկ{mono}
ցայտաձուկ:ցայտաձուկ{mono}
փայլաձուկ:փայլաձուկ{mono}
փայտաձուկ:փայտաձուկ{mono}
օղակաձուկ:օղակաձուկ{mono}
ագռաւաձուկ:ագռաւաձուկ{mono}
աղուեսաձուկ:աղուեսաձուկ{mono}
աշնանաձուկ:աշնանաձուկ{mono}
առիւծաձուկ:առիւծաձուկ{mono}
ասպարաձուկ:ասպարաձուկ{mono}
արծաթաձուկ:արծաթաձուկ{mono}
արքայաձուկ:արքայաձուկ{mono}
գոմիշաձուկ:գոմիշաձուկ{mono}
դորակաձուկ:դորակաձուկ{mono}
դրախտաձուկ:դրախտաձուկ{mono}
եղջերաձուկ:եղջերաձուկ{mono}
թութակաձուկ:թութակաձուկ{mono}
իշխանաձուկ:իշխանաձուկ{mono}
խարակաձուկ:խարակաձուկ{mono}
ծիրանաձուկ:ծիրանաձուկ{mono}
կանաչաձուկ:կանաչաձուկ{mono}
կարանաձուկ:կարանաձուկ{mono}
կարիճաձուկ:կարիճաձուկ{mono}
կարմրաձուկ:կարմրաձուկ{mono}
կիթառաձուկ:կիթառաձուկ{mono}
կոհակաձուկ:կոհակաձուկ{mono}
հայելաձուկ:հայելաձուկ{mono}
հովանաձուկ:հովանաձուկ{mono}
ճագարաձուկ:ճագարաձուկ{mono}
մելանաձուկ:մելանաձուկ{mono}
մողիզաձուկ:մողիզաձուկ{mono}
մօրինաձուկ:մօրինաձուկ{mono}
նիզակաձուկ:նիզակաձուկ{mono}
պանանաձուկ:պանանաձուկ{mono}
պիսակաձուկ:պիսակաձուկ{mono}
սկիւռաձուկ:սկիւռաձուկ{mono}
ստուերաձուկ:ստուերաձուկ{mono}
վահանաձուկ:վահանաձուկ{mono}
վարազաձուկ:վարազաձուկ{mono}
վարնգաձուկ:վարնգաձուկ{mono}
վիշապաձուկ:վիշապաձուկ{mono}
գեղարդաձուկ:գեղարդաձուկ{mono}
ելեկտրաձուկ:ելեկտրաձուկ{mono}
լապտերաձուկ:լապտերաձուկ{mono}
խարտոցաձուկ:խարտոցաձուկ{mono}
ծիածանաձուկ:ծիածանաձուկ{mono}
ծիծեռնաձուկ:ծիծեռնաձուկ{mono}
կենդանաձուկ:կենդանաձուկ{mono}
ճերմակաձուկ:ճերմակաձուկ{mono}
յամպարաձուկ:յամպարաձուկ{mono}
նաւուղղաձուկ:նաւուղղաձուկ{mono}
պատեանաձուկ:պատեանաձուկ{mono}
սկուտեղաձուկ:սկուտեղաձուկ{mono}
սպիտակաձուկ:սպիտակաձուկ{mono}
առագաստաձուկ:առագաստաձուկ{mono}
կաղամարաձուկ:կաղամարաձուկ{mono}
հրեշտակաձուկ:հրեշտակաձուկ{mono}
մանիշակաձուկ:մանիշակաձուկ{mono}
մանուշակաձուկ:մանուշակաձուկ{mono}
մարգարտաձուկ:մարգարտաձուկ{mono}
